Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 55. Oil and Gas Production Tax and Oil Surcharge.

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas properties production tax, see 15 AAC 55.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 36(b), ch. 2, TSSLA 2006 provides the following: “For oil and gas produced before April 1, 2006, the provisions of AS 43.55, and regulations adopted under AS 43.55, that were in effect before April 1, 2006, and that were applicable to the oil and gas continue to apply to that oil and gas.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 2, TSSLA 2006 (HB 3001), proposing amendments to provisions of this chapter to replace the oil and gas production tax based on gross value with one based on a production tax value—-a net value determined after deduction of specified allowable costs—-and outlining other changes related to administration of the amended production tax and modifying the oil surcharge, see 2006 House Journal 4220 — 4222.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 1, SSSLA 2007 (HB 2001), proposing amendments to the production tax on oil and gas and amendments to other statutes to aid in the administration and enforcement of that tax, see 2007 House Journal 1547 — 1550.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 4, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 247) proposing changes to oil and gas tax credits and oil and gas taxes, see 2016 House Journal 1437 — 1439.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Application of the state oil and gas production tax to oil and gas production from the National Petroleum Reserve in Alaska and from onshore federal leases in the Cook Inlet area is not preempted by federal law.
However, as, by definition, the Outer Continental Shelf consists of submerged lands lying outside the state’s seaward boundaries, Alaska law does not purport to tax oil or gas that is produced from a lease or property on that land.
2002 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 22.